dictsource/ps_rules
.group د
	د	d
	د (_	d
	دھ	d
	_) د (َ	d@      // Initial with fatha
	_) د (ِ	d@      // Initial with kasra
	_) د (ُ	d@      // Initial with damma
	د (L02L02	d@      // Before consonant cluster
	د (د	d:      // Geminated
	د (ر	dr      // Common cluster
	_) دوست	do:st   // Friend
	_) دل	d@l     // Heart
	_) دود	dod     // Tradition/custom
	_) دنیا	d@n'ja: // World
	_) درد	d@rd    // Pain
	_) دانه	da:'n@  // Grain/seed
	_) دیوال	di'wa:l // Wall
	_) دروازه	d@rwa:'z@ // Door
	_) دښمن	d@S'm@n // Enemy
	_) دوه	dw@     // Two
	_) دندان	d@n'da:n // Tooth
	_) دریاب	d@r'ja:b // River
	_) دوکان	d@'ka:n  // Shop
	_) دانش	da:'n@S  // Knowledge
	_) دعا	d@'a:    // Prayer

.group ډ
	ډ	d.
	ډ (_	d.
	ډھ	d.
	_) ډ (َ	d.@     // Initial with fatha
	_) ډ (ِ	d.@     // Initial with kasra
	_) ډ (ُ	d.@     // Initial with damma
	ډ (L02L02	d.@     // Before consonant cluster
	ډ (ډ	d.:     // Geminated
	ډ (ر	d.r     // Common cluster
	_) ډوډۍ	d.o:'d.@j // Bread
	_) ډک	d.@k     // Full
	_) ډار	d.a:r    // Fear
	_) ډول	d.ol     // Type/kind
	_) ډیر	d.er     // Many/much
	_) ډنډ	d.@n'd.  // Pond
	_) ډبره	d.@'br@  // Stone/rock
	_) ډله	d.@'l@   // Group
	_) ډوب	d.ob     // Drowned/sunk
	_) ډاکټر	d.a:k't.@r // Doctor
	_) ډرامه	d.ra:'m@ // Drama
	_) ډیزل	d.i'z@l  // Diesel
	_) ډنډوره	d.@n'd.o:r@ // Rumor
	_) ډنډ	d.@nd.   // Pond
	_) ډیوه	d.i:'w@  // Lamp

.group ذ
	ذ	z
	ذ (_	z
	_) ذ (َ	z@      // Initial with fatha
	_) ذ (ِ	z@      // Initial with kasra
	_) ذ (ُ	z@      // Initial with damma
	ذ (L02L02	z@      // Before consonant cluster
	ذ (ذ	z:      // Geminated
	_) ذکر	z@kr    // Mention/remembrance
	_) ذات	za:t    // Self/being
	_) ذهن	z@h@n   // Mind
	_) ذخیره	z@xi:'r@ // Reserve/storage
	_) ذره	z@'r@   // Particle
	_) ذمه	z@'m@   // Responsibility
	_) ذلت	z@'l@t  // Humiliation
	_) ذوق	zoq     // Taste/interest
	_) ذریعه	z@ri:'@ // Means/source
	_) ذکاوت	z@ka:'w@t // Intelligence
	_) ذبح	z@b@h   // Slaughter
	_) ذیل	z@'j@l  // Following/below

.group ر
	ر	r
	ر (_	r
	_) ر (َ	r@      // Initial with fatha
	_) ر (ِ	r@      // Initial with kasra
	_) ر (ُ	r@      // Initial with damma
	ر (L02L02	r@      // Before consonant cluster
	ر (ر	r:      // Geminated
	L02) ر (L02	@r      // Epenthetic schwa between consonants
	_) روڼ	ru'n.    // Bright/clear
	_) راز	ra:z     // Secret
	_) روح	ruh      // Soul/spirit
	_) رنګ	r@ng     // Color
	_) رڼا	r@'n.a:  // Light
	_) راتلل	ra:'t@l@l // To come
	_) روغ	roQ      // Healthy
	_) رسول	r@'su:l  // To deliver
	_) رخصت	r@x'sat  // Leave/holiday
	_) رسۍ	r@'s@j   // Rope
	_) روان	r@'wa:n  // Flowing/current
	_) رښتیا	r@S.'ti:a: // Truth
	_) رپوټ	r@'po:t.  // Report
	_) رمه	r@'m@    // Herd/flock

.group ړ
	ړ	r.
	ړ (_	r.
	_) ړ (َ	r.@     // Initial with fatha
	_) ړ (ِ	r.@     // Initial with kasra
	_) ړ (ُ	r.@     // Initial with damma
	ړ (L02L02	r.@     // Before consonant cluster
	ړ (ړ	r.:     // Geminated
	L02) ړ (L02	@r.     // Epenthetic schwa between consonants
	_) ړنګ	r.@ng    // Demolition/destruction
	_) ړوند	r.u:nd   // Blind
	_) ړومبی	r.u:m'b@j // First/primary
	_) ړنګول	r.@n'gu:l // To demolish
	_) ړنګېدل	r.@nge:'d@l // To collapse
	_) ړاندې	r.a:n'de // Forward/ahead
	_) ړبوږن	r.@'bu:Z.@n // Rough/uneven
	_) ړبېښل	r.@'be:S.@l // To shine/glitter
	_) ړوکی	r.u:'k@j  // Small/little
	_) ړوپ	r.u:p    // Gulp/sip

.group ز
	ز	z
	ز (_	z
	_) ز (َ	z@      // Initial with fatha
	_) ز (ِ	z@      // Initial with kasra
	_) ز (ُ	z@      // Initial with damma
	ز (L02L02	z@      // Before consonant cluster
	ز (ز	z:      // Geminated
	ز (د	zd      // Common cluster
	زده (ک	zd@'ko  // Special case for student (zd@_ko:w@n'k@j)
	زده (کوون	zd@_ko:w@n  // Extended special case for student
	_) زر	z@r     // Gold
	_) زړه	z@'r.@  // Heart
	_) زوی	zu:j    // Son
	_) زما	z@'ma:  // My/mine
	_) زمری	z@m'r@j // Lion
	_) زمکه	z@m'k@  // Earth/land
	_) زیات	zi:'a:t // More/additional
	_) زخم	z@'x@m  // Wound/injury
	_) زور	zo:r    // Force/strength
	_) زېږېدل	ze:Ze:'d@l // To be born
	_) زرغون	z@r'Qu:n // Green
	_) زاړه	za:'r.@ // Old (plural)
	_) زنګون	z@n'gu:n // Knee

.group ژ
	ژ	Z       // Updated to match ph_pashto
	ژ (_	Z       // Updated to match ph_pashto
	_) ژ (َ	Z@      // Initial with fatha
	_) ژ (ِ	Z@      // Initial with kasra
	_) ژ (ُ	Z@      // Initial with damma
	ژ (L02L02	Z@      // Before consonant cluster
	ژ (ژ	Z:      // Geminated
	L02) ژ (L02	@Z      // Epenthetic schwa between consonants
	_) ژوند	Zu:nd    // Life
	_) ژر	Z@r      // Quick/fast
	_) ژړا	Z@'r.a:  // Crying/weeping
	_) ژمی	Z@'m@j   // Winter
	_) ژباړه	Z@'ba:r.@ // Translation
	_) ژمنه	Z@'m@n@  // Promise
	_) ژوبل	Zu:'b@l  // Wounded/injured
	_) ژېړ	Ze:r.    // Yellow
	_) ژغورل	Z@'Qu:r@l // To save/rescue
	_) ژاړل	Za:'r.@l  // To cry/weep
	_) ژورنال	Zu:r'na:l // Journal

.group ږ
	ږ	Z.      // Updated to match ph_pashto (Z. for retroflex version)
	ږ (_	Z.      // Updated to match ph_pashto
	_) ږ (َ	Z.@     // Updated to match ph_pashto
	_) ږ (ِ	Z.@     // Updated to match ph_pashto
	_) ږ (ُ	Z.@     // Updated to match ph_pashto
	ږ (L02L02	Z.@     // Updated to match ph_pashto
	ږ (ږ	Z.:     // Updated to match ph_pashto
	ږ (م	Z.m     // Updated to match ph_pashto
	ږ (د	Z.d     // Updated to match ph_pashto
	_) ږغ	Z.@Q         // Call/voice
	_) ږيره	Z.'i:r.a     // ‌‌Beard
	_) ږلۍ	Z.@'l@i      // Hail/sleet
	_) ږمنځ	Z.@'m@n.Z    // Armpit
	_) ږوب	Z.o:b        // Wet/soaked
	_) ږوند	Z.u:nd       // Deaf
	_) ږېږدېدل	Z.e:Z.'de:d@l // To tremble/shake
	_) ږېرۍ	Z.e:'r@i     // Slope/incline
	_) ږلېدل	Z.@'le:d@l   // To shine/glitter
	_) ږوږ	Z.u:Z.       // Noise/sound
	_) ږمونږ	Z.@'mu:n.Z.  // We/us (variant)

.group س
	س	s
	س (_	s
	_) س (َ	s@      // Initial with fatha
	_) س (ِ	s@      // Initial with kasra
	_) س (ُ	s@      // Initial with damma
	س (L02L02	s@      // Before consonant cluster
	س (س	s:      // Geminated
	س (ت	s@'t    // Common sequence
	س (تان	s@'ta:n // Common ending
	س (ر	sr      // Common cluster
	س (پ	sp      // Common cluster
	س (ټ	st.     // Common cluster
	س (ا	sa:     // Common combinations
	س (و	su:
	س (ی	si:
	س (ې	se:
	س (ۍ	s@i
	س (ل	sl      // Consonant clusters
	س (ن	sn
	س (د	sd
	س (ش	sS
	س (ک	sk
	س (م	sm
	س (ړ	sr.     // Specific to Pashto
	س (ښ	sS.     // Updated to match ph_pashto
	_) سر	s@r     // Head
	_) سور	su:r    // Red
	_) سپین	s@'pi:n // White
	_) سړی	s@'r.@j // Man
	_) سترګه	s@'t@rg@ // Eye
	_) سیند	si:nd   // River
	_) سوله	su:'l@  // Peace
	_) سږکال	s@Z.'ka:l // This year
	_) سمندر	s@'m@nd@r // Ocean
	_) سیمه	si:'m@  // Area/region
	_) سپوږمۍ	s@'pu:Z.m@i // Moon
	_) سهار	s@'ha:r // Morning

.group ش
	ش	S
	ش (_	S
	_) ش (َ	S@      // Initial with fatha
	_) ش (ِ	S@      // Initial with kasra
	_) ش (ُ	S@      // Initial with damma
	ش (L02L02	S@      // Before consonant cluster
	ش (ش	S:      // Geminated
	ش (ت	St      // Common cluster
	ش (ک	Sk      // Common cluster
	ش (ا	Sa:     // Common combinations
	ش (و	Su:
	ش (ی	Si:
	ش (ې	Se:
	ش (ۍ	S@i
	ش (ر	Sr      // Consonant clusters
	ش (ل	Sl
	ش (ن	Sn
	ش (د	Sd
	ش (س	Ss
	ش (م	Sm
	ش (ړ	Sr.     // Specific to Pashto
	ش (ښ	SS.     // Updated to match ph_pashto
	_) شپه	S@'p@   // Night
	_) شین	Si:n    // Green
	_) شمال	S@'ma:l // North
	_) شکر	Su'k@r  // Sugar
	_) شاه	Sa:h    // King
	_) شوق	So:q    // Desire/passion
	_) شېر	Se:r    // Lion
	_) شړل	S@'r.@l // To expel/drive away
	_) شمېر	S@'me:r // Number/count
	_) شونډه	Su:'n.d.@ // Lip
	_) شاتو	Sa:'tu: // Honey
	_) شاوخوا	Sa:w'xu:a: // Around/surrounding

.group ښ
	ښ	S.      // Updated to match ph_pashto
	ښ (_	S.      // Updated to match ph_pashto
	_) ښ (َ	S.@     // Updated to match ph_pashto
	_) ښ (ِ	S.@     // Updated to match ph_pashto
	_) ښ (ُ	S.@     // Updated to match ph_pashto
	ښ (L02L02	S.@     // Updated to match ph_pashto
	ښ (ښ	S.:     // Updated to match ph_pashto
	ښ (ت	S.t     // Updated to match ph_pashto
	ښ (ک	S.k     // Updated to match ph_pashto
	ښ (ا	S.a:    // Updated to match ph_pashto
	ښ (و	S.u:
	ښ (ی	S.i:
	ښ (ې	S.e:
	ښ (ۍ	S.@i
	ښ (ر	S.r     // Consonant clusters
	ښ (ل	S.l
	ښ (ن	S.n
	ښ (د	S.d
	ښ (س	S.s
	ښ (ش	S.S
	ښ (م	S.m
	ښ (ړ	S.r.    // Specific to Pashto
	_) ښه	S.@      // Good
	_) ښکار	S.@'ka:r  // Hunting
	_) ښکلی	S.@'k@l@j // Beautiful
	_) ښوونه	S.u:'w@n@ // Teaching/education
	_) ښاخ	S.a:x     // Branch
	_) ښامار	S.a:'ma:r // Dragon/serpent
	_) ښځه	S.@'dz@   // Woman
	_) ښوول	S.u:'w@l  // To show/teach
	_) ښکته	S.@'k@t@  // Down/below
	_) ښار	S.a:r     // City
	_) ښاروال	S.a:r'wa:l // Mayor
	_) ښوونکی	S.u:w@n'k@j // Teacher

.group ص
	ص	s
	ص (_	s
	_) ص (َ	s@      // Initial with fatha
	_) ص (ِ	s@      // Initial with kasra
	_) ص (ُ	s@      // Initial with damma
	ص (L02L02	s@      // Before consonant cluster
	ص (ص	s:      // Geminated
	ص (ا	sa:     // Common combinations
	ص (و	su:
	ص (ی	si:
	ص (ې	se:
	ص (ۍ	s@i
	ص (ر	sr      // Consonant clusters
	ص (ل	sl
	ص (ن	sn
	ص (د	sd
	ص (ت	st
	ص (س	ss
	ص (ش	sS
	ص (ک	sk
	ص (م	sm
	_) صبر	s@'b@r   // Patience
	_) صلح	su'l@h   // Peace
	_) صدا	s@'da:   // Sound/voice
	_) صنف	si'n@f   // Class/grade
	_) صورت	su:'r@t  // Face/form
	_) صاف	sa:f     // Clean
	_) صحت	si'h@t   // Health
	_) صنعت	s@'n@t   // Industry
	_) صدق	si'd@q   // Truth
	_) صفر	si'f@r   // Zero
	_) صندوق	s@n'du:q // Box
	_) صحرا	s@h'ra:  // Desert
	_) صابون	sa:'bu:n // Soap

.group ض
	ض	z
	ض (_	z
	_) ض (َ	z@      // Initial with fatha
	_) ض (ِ	z@      // Initial with kasra
	_) ض (ُ	z@      // Initial with damma
	ض (L02L02	z@      // Before consonant cluster
	ض (ض	z:      // Geminated
	ض (ا	za:     // Common combinations
	ض (و	zu:
	ض (ی	zi:
	ض (ې	ze:
	ض (ۍ	z@i
	ض (ر	zr      // Consonant clusters
	ض (ل	zl
	ض (ن	zn
	ض (د	zd
	ض (ت	zt
	ض (س	zs
	ض (ش	zS
	ض (ک	zk
	ض (م	zm
	_) ضرر	z@'r@r   // Harm/damage
	_) ضرب	z@'r@b   // Multiplication/strike
	_) ضرورت	z@ru:'r@t // Necessity/need
	_) ضعیف	z@'i:f   // Weak
	_) ضمیر	z@'mi:r  // Pronoun/conscience
	_) ضد	zi'd     // Against/opposite
	_) ضبط	z@'b@t   // Record/capture
	_) ضمانت	z@ma:'n@t // Guarantee
	_) ضلع	zi'l@?   // Side/district
	_) ضیاء	zi'ja:   // Light/brightness

.group ط
	ط	t
	ط (_	t
	_) ط (َ	t@      // Initial with fatha
	_) ط (ِ	t@      // Initial with kasra
	_) ط (ُ	t@      // Initial with damma
	ط (L02L02	t@      // Before consonant cluster
	ط (ط	t:      // Geminated
	ط (ا	ta:     // Common combinations
	ط (و	tu:
	ط (ی	ti:
	ط (ې	te:
	ط (ۍ	t@i
	ط (ر	tr      // Consonant clusters
	ط (ل	tl
	ط (ن	tn
	ط (د	td
	ط (س	ts
	ط (ش	tS
	ط (ک	tk
	ط (م	tm
	_) طب	ti'b     // Medicine
	_) طالب	ta:'lib   // Student/seeker
	_) طاقت	ta:'q@t   // Power/strength
	_) طوفان	tu:'fa:n  // Storm
	_) طلوع	tu'lu:?   // Sunrise/rising
	_) طبیعت	t@bi:'?@t // Nature
	_) طریقه	t@ri:'qa  // Method/way
	_) طلا	ti'la:    // Gold
	_) طاعت	ta:'?@t   // Obedience
	_) طبقه	t@'b@qa   // Class/layer
	_) طاس	ta:s      // Bowl
	_) طور	to:r      // Manner/way
	_) طیاره	t@ja:'ra  // Airplane

.group ظ
	ظ	z
	ظ (_	z
	_) ظ (َ	z@      // Initial with fatha
	_) ظ (ِ	z@      // Initial with kasra
	_) ظ (ُ	z@      // Initial with damma
	ظ (L02L02	z@      // Before consonant cluster
	ظ (ظ	z:      // Geminated
	ظ (ا	za:     // Common combinations
	ظ (و	zu:
	ظ (ی	zi:
	ظ (ې	ze:
	ظ (ۍ	z@i
	ظ (ر	zr      // Consonant clusters
	ظ (ل	zl
	ظ (ن	zn
	ظ (د	zd
	ظ (ت	zt
	ظ (س	zs
	ظ (ش	zS
	ظ (ک	zk
	ظ (م	zm
	_) ظلم	zu'lm    // Oppression/injustice
	_) ظاهر	za:'hir   // Apparent/visible
	_) ظرف	z@'r@f    // Container/vessel
	_) ظریف	z@'ri:f   // Elegant/witty
	_) ظهور	zu'hu:r   // Appearance/emergence
	_) ظن	z@'n      // Opinion/thought
	_) ظالم	za:'lim   // Oppressor/tyrant
	_) ظفر	z@'f@r    // Victory/triumph
	_) ظهر	zu'h@r    // Noon/midday
	_) ظرافت	z@ra:'f@t // Elegance/wit
